Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5982.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6bb. (1) For purposes of determining whether a covered request qualifies as a large-load data center, the commission shall aggregate electric demand across affiliated and functionally integrated facilities. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if a covered utility enters into a covered request that provides for preferential or individualized rates, terms, or conditions that materially deviate from generally applicable tariffs for service to a large-load data center, before the covered request may take effect, the commission shall review the terms of the covered request as a contested case conducted in accordance with chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288. A covered request must not be approved on an ex parte basis, has no force or effect as a matter of law, and must not be implemented, performed, relied on, or enforced until the contested case required under this subsection is completed, and the commission issues a final order that approves the covered request. (3) Nothing in this section is construed to alter substantive ratemaking standards, limit the commission's discretion to approve or deny a covered request, or prohibit a data center from receiving electric service or expanding operations. This section establishes procedural requirements only. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Affiliated" means under common ownership or operational control. (b) "Covered request" means a contract, tariff, rate, rider, amendment, or approval that provides preferential or individualized rates, terms, or conditions that materially deviate from generally applicable tariffs governing the electric services provided to a large-load data center. (c) "Covered utility" means an electric utility, municipally owned electric utility, cooperative electric utility, or gas utility. (d) "Data center" means a facility, or a campus of facilities, primarily used to house and operate information technology equipment and associated cooling, power conversion, and backup systems. (e) "Large-load data center" means a data center that is reasonably projected to have a coincidence peak electric demand of 100 megawatts or more within 36 months after beginning service, including an expansion.